Missouri, session 2026, SB1561.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 571.010 and 571.020, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 571.010 and 571.020, to read as follows:
571.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Antique, curio or relic firearm", any firearm so
defined by the National Gun Control Act, 18 U.S.C. Title 26,
Section 5845, and the United States Treasury/Bureau of
Alcohol Tobacco and Firearms, 27 CFR Section 178.11:
(a) "Antique firearm" is any firearm not designed or
redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire
ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before
1898, said ammunition not being manufactured any longer;
this includes any matchlock, wheel lock, flintlock,
percussion cap or similar type ignition system, or replica
thereof;
(b) "Curio or relic firearm" is any firearm deriving
value as a collectible weapon due to its unique design,
ignition system, operation or at least fifty years old,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1561 2
associated with a historical event, renown personage or
major war;
(2) "Blackjack", any instrument that is designed or
adapted for the purpose of stunning or inflicting physical
injury by striking a person, and which is readily capable of
lethal use;
(3) "Blasting agent", any material or mixture,
consisting of fuel and oxidizer that is intended for
blasting, but not otherwise defined as an explosive under
this section, provided that the finished product, as mixed
for use of shipment, cannot be detonated by means of a
numbered 8 test blasting cap when unconfined;
(4) "Concealable firearm", any firearm with a barrel
less than sixteen inches in length, measured from the face
of the bolt or standing breech;
(5) "Deface", to alter or destroy the manufacturer's
or importer's serial number or any other distinguishing
number or identification mark;
(6) "Detonator", any device containing a detonating
charge that is used for initiating detonation in an
explosive, including but not limited to, electric blasting
caps of instantaneous and delay types, nonelectric blasting
caps for use with safety fuse or shock tube and detonating
cord delay connectors;
(7) "Explosive weapon", any explosive, incendiary, or
poison gas bomb or similar device designed or adapted for
the purpose of inflicting death, serious physical injury, or
substantial property damage; or any device designed or
adapted for delivering or shooting such a weapon. For the
purposes of this subdivision, the term "explosive" shall
mean any chemical compound mixture or device, the primary or
common purpose of which is to function by explosion,

SB 1561 3
including but not limited to, dynamite and other high
explosives, pellet powder, initiating explosives,
detonators, safety fuses, squibs, detonating cords, igniter
cords, and igniters or blasting agents;
(8) "Firearm", any weapon that is designed or adapted
to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive;
(9) "Firearm silencer", any instrument, attachment, or
appliance that is designed or adapted to muffle the noise
made by the firing of any firearm;
(10) "Gas gun", any gas ejection device, weapon,
cartridge, container or contrivance other than a gas bomb
that is designed or adapted for the purpose of ejecting any
poison gas that will cause death or serious physical injury,
but not any device that ejects a repellant or temporary
incapacitating substance;
(11) "Intoxicated", substantially impaired mental or
physical capacity resulting from introduction of any
substance into the body;
(12) "Knife", any dagger, dirk, stiletto, or bladed
hand instrument that is readily capable of inflicting
serious physical injury or death by cutting or stabbing a
person. For purposes of this chapter, knife does not
include any ordinary pocketknife with no blade more than
four inches in length;
(13) "Knuckles", any instrument that consists of
finger rings or guards made of a hard substance that is
designed or adapted for the purpose of inflicting serious
physical injury or death by striking a person with a fist
enclosed in the knuckles;
(14) "Machine gun", any firearm that is capable of
firing more than one shot automatically, without manual
reloading, by a single function of the trigger;

SB 1561 4
(15) "Projectile weapon", any bow, crossbow, pellet
gun, slingshot or other weapon that is not a firearm, which
is capable of expelling a projectile that could inflict
serious physical injury or death by striking or piercing a
person;
(16) "Rapid fire device", any accessory, conversion
kit, device, or tool that attaches to a semiautomatic
firearm and allows the firearm to discharge two or more
shots when the device is activated, or a manual or power
driven device that, when attached to a semiautomatic
firearm, increases the rate of fire of that firearm;
(17) "Rifle", any firearm designed or adapted to be
fired from the shoulder and to use the energy of the
explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire a projectile
through a rifled bore by a single function of the trigger;
[(17)] (18) "School", any charter school, as such term
is defined in section 160.400, any private school, as such
term is defined in section 166.700, or any public school, as
such term is defined in section 160.011;
100 [(18)] (19) "Short barrel", a barrel length of less
101 than sixteen inches for a rifle and eighteen inches for a
102 shotgun, both measured from the face of the bolt or standing
103 breech, or an overall rifle or shotgun length of less than
104 twenty-six inches;
105 [(19)] (20) "Shotgun", any firearm designed or adapted
106 to be fired from the shoulder and to use the energy of the
107 explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire a number of shot
108 or a single projectile through a smooth bore barrel by a
109 single function of the trigger;
110 [(20)] (21) "Spring gun", any fused, timed or
111 nonmanually controlled trap or device designed or adapted to

SB 1561 5
112 set off an explosion for the purpose of inflicting serious
113 physical injury or death;
114 [(21)] (22) "Switchblade knife", any knife which has a
115 blade that folds or closes into the handle or sheath, and:
116 (a) That opens automatically by pressure applied to a
117 button or other device located on the handle; or
118 (b) That opens or releases from the handle or sheath
119 by the force of gravity or by the application of centrifugal
120 force.
571.020. 1. A person commits an offense if such
person knowingly possesses, manufactures, transports,
repairs, or sells:
(1) An explosive weapon;
(2) An explosive, incendiary or poison substance or
material with the purpose to possess, manufacture or sell an
explosive weapon;
(3) A gas gun;
(4) A bullet or projectile which explodes or detonates
upon impact because of an independent explosive charge after
having been shot from a firearm; [or]
(5) Knuckles; [or]
(6) Any of the following in violation of federal law:
(a) A machine gun;
(b) A short-barreled rifle or shotgun;
(c) A firearm silencer; [or]
(d) A switchblade knife; or
(7) A rapid fire device.
2. A person does not commit an offense pursuant to
this section if his or her conduct involved any of the items
in subdivisions (1) to (5) of subsection 1, the item was
possessed in conformity with any applicable federal law, and
the conduct:

SB 1561 6
(1) Was incident to the performance of official duty
by the Armed Forces, National Guard, a governmental law
enforcement agency, or a penal institution; or
(2) Was incident to engaging in a lawful commercial or
business transaction with an organization enumerated in
subdivision (1) of this [section] subsection; or
(3) Was incident to using an explosive weapon in a
manner reasonably related to a lawful industrial or
commercial enterprise; or
(4) Was incident to displaying the weapon in a public
museum or exhibition; or
(5) Was incident to using the weapon in a manner
reasonably related to a lawful dramatic performance.
3. An offense pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3)
[or], (6), or (7) of subsection 1 of this section is a class
D felony; a crime pursuant to subdivision (4) or (5) of
subsection 1 of this section is a class A misdemeanor.
✓